California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
 recipient of, state health subsidy programs, limited to the Medi-Cal program provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the Medi-Cal Access Program provided pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the state health subsidy programs referenced in this subparagraph.

(B) Verifying or determining the eligibility of an applicant for, or a recipient of, state or federal subsidies offered through the California Health Benefit Exchange, provided pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code, including federal tax credits and cost-sharing assistance pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the
 federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the California Health Benefit Exchange.

(C) Verifying or determining the eligibility of employees and employers for health coverage through the Small Business Health Options Program, provided pursuant to Section 100502 of the Government Code, when the verification or determination is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the Small Business Health Options Program.

(2) The information provided under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of, and provided to the extent permitted by, federal law and regulations, including Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ae) To provide any
 peace officer with the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles with information pursuant to subdivision (i), when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Investigations Division and requests this information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud, and there is reasonable suspicion that the crime is a felony and that the information would lead to relevant evidence regarding the identity theft, counterfeiting, document fraud, or consumer fraud. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, and to the extent the information is available and accessible within the constraints and configurations of existing department records. Any person who receives any information under this subdivision shall make a written report of the information to the Investigations Division of the Department of Motor Vehicles,
 for filing under the normal procedures of that division.

(af) Until January 1, 2020, to enable the Department of Finance to prepare and submit the report required by Section 13084 of the Government Code that identifies all employers in California that employ 100 or more employees who receive benefits from the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). The information used for this purpose shall be limited to information obtained pursuant to Section 11026.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and from the administration of personal income tax wage withholding pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) and the disability insurance program and may be disclosed to the Department of Finance only for the purpose of preparing and submitting the report and only to the extent not prohibited by federal law.

(ag) To provide, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, the Student Aid Commission with wage information in order to verify the employment status of an individual applying for a Cal Grant C award pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 69439 of the Education Code.

(ah) To enable the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to obtain quarterly wage data of former inmates who have been incarcerated within the prison system in order to assess the impact of rehabilitation services or the lack of these services on the employment and earnings of these former inmates. Quarterly data for a former inmate’s employment status and wage history shall be provided for a period of one year, three years, and five years following release. The data shall only be used for the purpose of tracking outcomes for former inmates in order to assess the effectiveness of rehabilitation strategies on the wages and employment histories of
 those formerly incarcerated. The information shall be provided to the department to the extent not prohibited by federal law.

(ai) To enable federal, state, or local government departments or agencies, or their contracted agencies, subject to federal law, including the confidentiality, disclosure, and other requirements set forth in Part 603 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to evaluate, research, or forecast the effectiveness of public social services programs administered pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Part A of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), when the evaluation, research, or forecast is directly connected with, and limited to, the administration of the public social services programs.

(aj) (1) To enable the California
 Workforce Development Board, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Social Services, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the Employment Training Panel, and a chief elected official, as that term is defined in Section 3102(9) of Title 29 of the United States Code, to access any relevant quarterly wage data necessary for the evaluation and reporting of their respective program performance outcomes as required and permitted by various local, state, and federal laws pertaining to performance measurement and program evaluation, including responsibilities arising under Sections 14013, 14033, and 14042 of this code and Sections 2032 and 2038 of the Streets and Highways Code; the federal Workforce
 Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128); the workforce metrics dashboard pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14013; the Adult Education Block Grant Program consortia performance metrics pursuant to Section 84920 of the Education Code; the economic and workforce development program performance measures pursuant to Section 88650 of the Education Code; and the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program performance measures established in Part 52.5 (commencing with Section 88600) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Disclosures under this subdivision shall comply with federal and state privacy laws that require the informed consent from program participants of city and county departments or agencies that administer public workforce development programs for the evaluation, research, or forecast of their programs regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.

(2) The
 department shall do all of the following:

(A) Consistent with this subdivision, develop the minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision regardless of local, state, or federal funding source.

(B) Develop a standard application for submitting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision.

(C) Approve or deny a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, or request additional information, within 20 business days of receiving the standard application. The entity submitting the application shall respond to any request by the department for additional information within 20 business days of receipt of the department’s request. Within 30 calendar days of receiving any additional information, the department shall
 provide a final approval or denial of the request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision. Any approval, denial, or request for additional information shall be in writing. Denials shall identify the reason or category of reasons for the denial.

(D) Make publicly available on the department’s internet website all of the following:

(i) The minimum requirements for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, as developed pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(ii) The standard application developed pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(iii) The timeframe for information request determinations by the department, as specified in subparagraph (C).

(iv) Contact information for assistance with requests for disclosures of information authorized by this subdivision.

(v) Any denials for requests of disclosure of information authorized by this subdivision, including the reason or category of reasons for the denial.

(ak) (1) To provide any peace officer with the Enforcement Branch of the Department of Insurance with both of the following:

(A) Information provided pursuant to subdivision (i) that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving automobile insurance fraud, life insurance and annuity fraud, property and casualty insurance fraud, and organized automobile insurance fraud. That information shall be provided when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the
 Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or unlawful act.

(B) Employee, wage, employer, and state disability insurance claim information that relates to a specific insurance fraud investigation involving health or disability insurance fraud when the requesting peace officer has been designated by the Chief of the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance and requests the information in the course of, and as part of, an investigation into the commission of a crime or other unlawful act when there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the crime or act may be connected to the information requested and would lead to relevant information regarding the crime or
 unlawful act.

(2) To enable the State Department of Developmental Services to obtain quarterly wage data and unemployment insurance claim data of consumers served by that department for the purposes of monitoring, program operation and evaluation, and evaluating employment outcomes, of the Employment First Policy, established pursuant to Section 4869 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations.

(al) To provide the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board with employer tax information for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, the CalSavers Retirement Savings Trust Act (Title 21 (commencing with Section 100000) of the Government Code). The information should be
 limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate, and shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.

(am) (1) To enable the Joint Enforcement Strike Force as established by Section 329, and the Labor Enforcement Task Force, as established pursuant to Assembly Bill 1464 of the 2011–12 Regular Session (Chapter 21 of the Statutes of 2012), to carry out their duties.

(2) To provide an agency listed in subdivision (a) of Section 329 intelligence, data, including confidential tax and fee information, documents, information, complaints, or lead referrals pursuant to Section 15925 of the Government Code.

(an) To enable the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education to access and use any relevant quarterly wage data necessary to perform the labor market outcome
 reporting data match pursuant to Section 94892.6 of the Education Code. The information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.

(ao) To enable the Civil Rights Department to carry out its duties, including ensuring compliance with Section 12999 of the Government Code. Conduct related to information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the criminal sanctions set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1094.

(ap) To enable the Cradle-to-Career Data System, as established by Article 2 (commencing with Section 10860) of Chapter 8.5 of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to receive employment and earnings data and, as required by the director pursuant to Section 10871 of the Education Code, to provide information to the data system, to the extent permissible by
 federal laws and regulations.

(aq) (1) To enable the State Air Resources Board to receive unpaid final tax assessment information issued to a port drayage motor carrier or short-haul trucking service for misclassification of a commercial driver, for use in the administration of, and to facilitate compliance with, Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 39680) of Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code. The information shall be limited to the tax information the director deems appropriate for disclosure and shall be provided only to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Commercial driver” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.

(B) “Port drayage motor carrier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2810.4 of the Labor Code.

(C) “Short-haul trucking service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39682 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ar) To enable the California Health Benefit Exchange to do all of the following:

(1) Notify an employer that an employee has been determined eligible for advance payments of the premium tax credit and cost-sharing reductions and has enrolled in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange, as required pursuant to Section 155.310(h) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The information shall include available employer contact information, including addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.

(2) Assist the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services in determining eligibility for the insurance affordability programs administered by those state agencies. The determination of eligibility or entitlement shall include efforts by either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services to assist those individuals in obtaining that coverage, including informing those individuals potentially eligible for health coverage of the availability of that coverage.

(3) Verify if a consumer has been offered affordable comprehensive employer-sponsored health care coverage pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code and the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148). The information shall include available employer contact information, including
 addresses, email addresses, and telephone numbers.

(4) Upon the request of either the California Health Benefit Exchange or the State Department of Health Care Services, the department shall also provide to the relevant state agency information on new applicants for unemployment insurance, state disability insurance, and paid family leave. The California Health Benefit Exchange and the State Department of Health Care Services shall at all times request from the department the minimum amount of information necessary from the information listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code, to accomplish the purposes of Section 100503.9 of the Government Code. The information shall be sent in a manner that is encrypted or otherwise complies with government data security best practices, as specified by the California Health Benefit Exchange. This information shall only be used for the purposes of outreach and
 marketing.

(5) This subdivision shall become operative no later than September 1, 2023.

(as) To enable the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the office of the President of the University of California to access any relevant quarterly wage data necessary for students who have attended their respective systems to assess the impact of education on the employment and earnings of those students and demonstrate compliance with the federal and state Workforce Pell Grant requirements pursuant to Public Law 119-21 to determine Workforce Pell Grant program eligibility. Disclosures and redisclosures under this subdivision shall be provided to the extent permitted by federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 32.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1095.5.

(a) (1) The director shall permit the use of any information in their possession to the extent necessary to enable the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission to receive quarterly wage data of individuals with a mental health disorder or a substance use disorder, or both, served by the California public mental health and substance use disorder system for the purpose of monitoring and evaluating employment outcomes to determine the effectiveness of those services.

(2) The director may require reimbursement for all direct costs incurred in providing any information specified in this section.

(3) The information shall be provided to the extent permitted under applicable federal statute and regulation.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 10.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1096.

Where a number of workers are normally employed in employment in the course of a year by several employers, such employers, with the approval of the director, may appoint an agent. The agent may maintain records and prepare and file returns and reports required under this division with respect to such workers, including returns and reports of wages paid to the workers, and may pay the employers’ and workers’ contributions levied under this division with respect to wages paid to such workers and perform such other acts on behalf of such employers as the director may authorize all in the same manner as though the agent were the employer of the workers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1097.

The manner of crediting to each employer the employment experience of the group of employers who have appointed an agent pursuant to Section 1096, for the purpose of any classification of employers made pursuant to this division for the determinations of future rates of employers’ contributions, may be prescribed by authorized regulations. Employers who operate or do business in more than one place may, with the approval of the director, appoint a separate agent in each such place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1098.

Nothing contained in Sections 1096 or 1097 shall be construed to make the agent the employer of the workers, or relieve any employer of his obligations to comply with this division, except to the extent that his obligations are discharged by the agent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Payment of Reported Contributions [1110. - 1119.]

1110.

(a) Employer contributions required under Sections 976 and 976.6, the amount of benefits received by any individual pursuant to this part that is deducted from an award or settlement made by the employer under Section 1382, and, except as provided by subdivision (b), worker contributions required under Section 984 are due and payable on the first day of the calendar month following the close of each calendar quarter and shall become delinquent if not paid on or before the last day of that month.

(b) Worker contributions required under Section 984 are due and payable at the same time and by the same method as amounts required to be withheld under Section 13020 are paid to the department pursuant to Section 13021, regardless of the amount of accumulated unpaid
 liability for worker contributions.

(c) Employer contributions submitted pursuant to Section 976.5 shall be paid on or before the last working day of March of the calendar year to which the reduced contribution rate would be applicable. Any employer whose eligibility for an unemployment insurance contribution rate determination is redetermined to make that employer eligible to submit voluntary unemployment insurance contributions in accordance with Section 976.5, may submit a voluntary unemployment insurance contribution within 30 days of the date of notification of the redetermination.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), any employer described in Sections 682 and 684 may elect to report and pay employer contributions required under Sections 976 and 976.6, and worker contributions required under Section 984, annually. All contributions are due and payable on the first day
 of January following the close of the prior calendar year and shall become delinquent if not paid on or before the last day of that month. An election under this subdivision shall be effective the first day of the calendar year in which it is approved by the department. An election under this subdivision may not be approved if the employer has an outstanding return or report delinquency on the records of the department, or an unpaid amount owed to the department, that is not the subject of a timely petition for reassessment pending before the appeals board at the time the election is filed.

(e) An employer described in Sections 682 and 684 who pays more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in wages annually, shall not be entitled to the election allowed in subdivision (d). If at any time during the year the total wages paid by an employer electing to file under subdivision (d) exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the election shall be
 terminated at the close of that calendar quarter. In addition to the report of wages due for that quarter, the employer shall file a return and pay any contributions due for that portion of the year during which the election was in effect, and shall pay contributions in accordance with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) for the remainder of that year.

(f) Contributions due pursuant to this section may be submitted by electronic funds transfer. Contributions submitted by electronic funds transfer shall be deemed complete in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) of Section 13021.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), effective on and after January 1, 2017, an employer with 10 or more employees shall remit the contributions and withholdings by electronic funds transfer.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), effective on and after January 1, 2018, all employers shall remit the contributions and withholdings by electronic funds transfer.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), an employer may request a waiver from the electronic funds transfer requirement of this subdivision. The department may grant the waiver when the employer has established to the satisfaction of the director that there is a lack of automation, a severe economic hardship, a current exemption from filing electronically for federal purposes, or other good cause. An approved waiver shall be valid for one year or longer, at the discretion of the director.

(h) For purposes of this section, “electronic funds transfer” shall have the same meaning as in Section 13021.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 248.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1110.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director shall allocate any payment to the department relating to liability for contributions, withheld personal income tax, penalty and interest, in accordance with any designation made by the payer at or before the time the payment is made to the department.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a payer, at or before the time a payment is made to the department, does not designate an obligation to which the payment is to be applied, the director shall allocate the payment in the following order of
 priority:

(1) Employer contributions required under Sections 976 and 976.6, worker contributions, and withheld personal income tax, in proportion to the aggregate amount of such employer contributions, worker contributions, and withheld personal income tax due.

(2) Penalties and interest due under this division, and penalties and interest due based upon withheld personal income tax.

(c) The director may apply the following standards in making any allocation under this section:

(1) First priority may be given to the extinction of obligations due at the time of payment with respect to which a lien has not been recorded, in the order inverse to that in which the obligation became due.

(2) Second priority may be given to the extinction of obligations due at the time of payment with respect to which a lien has been recorded. If more than one lien has been recorded, the obligations covered by the most recent lien recorded may be extinguished in full before any payment is allocated to obligations covered by the next prior lien recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1075, Sec. 12.3.)
-------------------------------------------

1110.6.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1110, whenever the liability of an employer for contributions under this division arises under the terms of a written contract in which such employer has agreed, for the benefit of another party to such contract, to assume ultimate liability for contributions under this division in the event of the default in payment thereof by any other employer affected by such contract, such contributions shall not become delinquent and no penalties or interest prescribed by this chapter shall commence to accrue with respect to such contracting employer, until after the 30th day following the date of mailing or service of notice upon him, by the
 director, of the default of any such other employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

The director for good cause may extend for not to exceed 60 days the time for making a return or report or paying without penalty any amount required to be paid under this division. Any employer to whom an extension is granted and who pays the amount required within the period for which the extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the contributions, interest at the adjusted annual rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code from the date on which the payment would have been delinquent without the extension
 until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.5.

If the Governor declares a state of emergency, the director may extend the time requirements for filing returns or reports pursuant to Section 1088 and the time requirement for payment of employer and worker contributions pursuant to Section 1110. The extension granted by the director pursuant to this section shall apply only to employers prevented by the conditions giving rise to the state of emergency from timely filing their returns or reports, or from timely payment of the taxes due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

(a) Any employer who without good cause fails to pay any contributions required of him or her or of his or her workers, except amounts assessed under Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 15 percent of the amount of those contributions.

(b) Any employer required to remit payments electronically who without good cause remits those amounts by means other than electronic shall pay a penalty of 15 percent of the amount of those contributions.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), on and after January 1, 2017,
 and before January 1, 2019, an employer required to remit payments electronically, excluding employers previously required to remit payments by electronic funds transfer under Section 13021, who remits those amounts within the time required by means that are not electronic shall not be subject to the penalty described in subdivision (b).

(d) The changes made to this section by Chapter 28 of the Statutes of 2014 shall apply on and after July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 222, Sec. 3.   (AB 1245)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.1.

(a) An employer who is required to file a quarterly return electronically pursuant to Section 1088 and without good cause fails to file a quarterly return electronically shall pay a penalty of fifty dollars ($50), in addition to any other penalties imposed by this code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), on and after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, an employer required to file a quarterly return electronically who files a quarterly return within the time required
 by means that are not electronic shall not be subject to the penalty described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 222, Sec. 4.   (AB 1245)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.5.

(a) Any employer who without good cause fails to file the return and reports required by subdivision (a) of Section 1088 and subdivision (a) of Section 13021 within 60 days of the time required under subdivision (a) of Section 1110 shall pay a penalty of 15 percent of the amount of contributions and personal income tax withholding required by this report. This penalty shall be in addition to the penalties required by Sections 1112 and 1126.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the amount of contributions and personal income tax required by the report of contributions shall be reduced by the amount of any contributions and personal income tax paid on or before the prescribed payment dates.

(c) The changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply on and after July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 91.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

Any employer who fails to pay any contributions required of him or of his workers, except amounts assessed under Article 8 (commencing with Section 1126), within the time required shall become liable for interest on such contributions at the adjusted annual rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code from and after the date of delinquency until paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 65.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.1.

An employer who, through an error caused by excusable neglect, makes an underpayment of the amount due on a report of contributions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1088 shall not be liable for penalty or interest under Sections 1112, 1113, 1127 or 1129 if proper adjustment is made at the time of the filing of the quarterly report of contributions and quarterly return, for the same calendar quarter under subdivision (a)
 of Section 1088 and an explanation of the error is attached to the report or return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 59.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1114.

(a) Any employer who, without good cause, fails to file within 15 days after service by the director of notice pursuant to Section 1206 of a specific written demand therefor, a report of wages of each of his or her workers required by this division, shall pay in addition to other amounts required, for each unreported wage item a penalty of twenty dollars ($20).

(b) Any employer required by this division to file a report of wages of each of his or her workers on magnetic media or other electronic means as prescribed by subdivision (e) or
 (h) of Section 1088, who, without good cause, instead files a report of wages by means other than electronic, shall pay, in addition to other amounts required, for each wage item a penalty of twenty dollars ($20).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), on and after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2019, an employer required to file a report of wages, excluding employers previously required to
 file a report of wages under subdivision (e) of Section 1088, who files a report of wages within the time required by means that are not electronic shall not be subject to the penalty described in subdivision (b).

(d) The changes made to this section by Chapter 28 of the Statutes of 2014 shall apply on and after July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 222, Sec. 5.   (AB 1245)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1115.

(a) If the director finds that the collection of any contributions will be jeopardized in any case where an employing unit is insolvent, or is delinquent in a substantial amount of contributions due under this division, or is about to discontinue business at any of its known places of business, or the business is of a temporary or seasonal nature, the director may, upon giving the employing unit 10 days’ notice pursuant to Section 1206:

(1) Require payment of contributions with
 respect to wages paid from the beginning date of the calendar quarter in which notice is given to the date designated in the notice.

(2) Require payment of contributions for reporting periods less than calendar quarters.

(b) As used in this section “reporting period” means that period less than a calendar quarter which is established by the director.

(c) Contributions required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section are due and payable on the date designated in the notice and shall become delinquent if not paid within 10 days of the due date.

(d) Contributions required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section are due and payable on the first day of the reporting period following the close of each reporting period and shall become delinquent if not paid
 within 10 days of the due date.

(e) The employing unit shall file within the time required for payment of contributions under this section a report or return as required by Section 1088, in the form and containing the information that the director prescribes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1116.

(a) (1) Every employing unit except a domestic or foreign corporation or a domestic or foreign limited liability company shall, within 10 days of quitting business, file with the director a final return and report of wages of its workers, in such form and containing such information as the director prescribes.

(2) Every domestic corporation and domestic limited liability company shall, within 10 days of quitting business or within 10 days of the commencement of proceedings to wind up its affairs and voluntarily dissolve, whichever expires the earlier, file with the director a return and a report of wages of its workers, in such form and containing such information as the director prescribes.

(3) Every foreign corporation and foreign limited liability company shall, within 10 days of quitting
 business or within 10 days of the surrender of its right to engage in business of this state in accordance with Section 2112 and subdivision (d) of Section 2114 of the Corporations Code for foreign corporations or Section 17708.08 of the Corporations Code for foreign limited liability companies, whichever expires the earlier, file with the director a final return and report of wages of its workers, in such form and containing such information as the director prescribes.

(4) As used in this section, “quitting business” does not include any change in the form or membership of an employing unit if before and after such change 50 percent or more of the control of management is held by the same individual, or is held by an individual before death and after the individual’s death by the individual’s estate or heirs.

(b) Contributions with respect to a return required under subdivision
 (a) are due and payable on the first day of the applicable 10-day period established pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall become delinquent if not paid within 10 days of the due date.

(c) The director for good cause may extend for not to exceed 30 days the time for making a return or paying without penalty or interest any amount required to be paid under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 30.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

1117.

If any employer fails to file the annual reconciliation return described in subdivision (e) of Section 1088 or subdivision (j) of Section 13021 on or before 30 days after notice has been given to the employer of his or her failure to file, unless the failure is due to good cause, the employer, in addition to any other penalties imposed by this code, shall pay a penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or 5 percent of the employer and worker contributions required to be reconciled by subdivision (e) of Section 1088, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1119.

The director shall notify the United States Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of Labor of the failure of an Indian tribe (as described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code) to make a payment of an amount required to be paid under this article within 90 days of the date of a notice specifying the amount due. If the amount due is subsequently paid by the Indian tribe, the director shall notify the United States Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of Labor of the satisfaction of the liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 516.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Assessments [1126. - 1145.]

1126.
